Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-385
Tax expenditure report; summary; submission required; joint hearing; supplemental information.

The report required under section 77-382 and a summary of the report shall be submitted to the Governor, the Executive Board of the Legislative Council, and the chairpersons of the Legislature's Revenue and Appropriations Committees on or before October 15, 1991, and October 15 of every even-numbered year thereafter. The report submitted to the executive board and the committees shall be submitted electronically. The department shall, on or before December 1 of each even-numbered year, appear at a joint hearing of the Appropriations Committee of the Legislature and the Revenue Committee of the Legislature and present the report. Any supplemental information requested by three or more committee members shall be presented within thirty days after the request. The summary shall be included with or appended to the Governor's budget presented to the Legislature in odd-numbered years.

Laws 1979, LB 17, § 7;

R.S.Supp.,1979, § 77-359;

Laws 1980, LB 834, § 26;

Laws 1991, LB 82, § 3;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 136;

Laws 2013, LB612, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB989, § 3;

Laws 2026, LB1048, § 9.
July 18, 2026